Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.01
Hunger-Free Schools Act, how cited.

Sections 79-10,139.01 to 79-10,139.09 shall be known and may be cited as the Hunger-Free Schools Act.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 1.
July 18, 2026